Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Behavior Analyst Practice Act, the definitions found in sections 38-4403 to 38-4408 apply.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 2.